Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.903

Effective date—2009 c 120.

In order to facilitate an orderly transition to licensing and minimize disruption in the mortgage marketplace, sections 10 through 14, 16 through 19, 21 through 25, and 27 through 29 of this act take effect July 1, 2010.

[ 2009 c 120 s 31.]